Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5674.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Bubbler fixture" means a fixture on a drinking water fountain through which water is forced up in a small arc from a nozzle that allows an individual to drink from the arc directly. (b) "Central reverse osmosis system" means a point-of-entry or centralized water treatment system that uses a semipermeable membrane and associated filters to remove dissolved solids, including lead and other contaminants, from the water supplied to multiple outlets within a building or facility. (c) "Certified lead-free fixtures" means plumbing fixtures, faucets, or components that meet the definition of lead-free under section 1417 of the safe drinking water act, 42 USC 300g?6, and are certified to meet NSF/ANSI standard 61. (d) "Certified local contractor" means a plumbing or mechanical contractor licensed under the skilled trades act, 2016 PA 407, MCL 339.5101 to 339.6133, or another contractor certified by the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy or the local health department to perform water sampling, plumbing, or filtration installation. (e) (b) "Child care center" means that term as defined in section 1 of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111. (f) (c) "Department" means the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy or its the department's authorized agent or representative. (g) (d) "Drinking fountain" means a plumbing fixture that is connected to the potable water distribution system and drainage system that allows a user to obtain a drink directly from a stream of flowing water without the use of any accessory. (h) (e) "Filtered bottle-filling station" or "station" means an apparatus that meets all of the following requirements: (i) Is connected to customer site piping. (ii) Filters water and is certified to meet NSF/ANSI standard 53 for lead reduction and NSF/ANSI standard 42 for particulate removal. (iii) The flow rate through the station is paired to the specified flow rate of the filter cartridge. (iv) Has a light or other device to indicate filter cartridge replacement status. (v) Is designed to fill drinking bottles or other containers for personal water consumption. (vi) Includes a drinking fountain. (i) (f) "Filtered faucet" means a faucet that at the point of use includes a filter that is certified to meet NSF/ANSI standard 53 for lead reduction and NSF/ANSI standard 42 for particulate removal. (j) (g) "Fund" means the school and child care center clean drinking water fund created in section 11. (k) "Local health department" means that term as defined in section 1105 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.1105. (l) "PEX piping" means cross-linked polyethylene piping that meets ASTM standards F876 and F877 and is approved for potable water applications under R 408.30701 to R 408.30796 of the Michigan Administrative Code. (m) (h) "Plan" means a drinking water management plan created under section 5. (n) (i) "School" means a public school or nonpublic school as those terms are defined in section 5 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.5. Sec. 5. (1) Within 15 months after the effective date of this act, Not later than January 14, 2025, each school shall develop a drinking water management plan, and make the plan available to the department, school staff, parents and guardians of children enrolled in the school, and the general public on request. A school may consult with the local health department in jurisdiction in the area in which the school is located or a certified local contractor for the development of the plan. The plan must do all of the following: (a) Specify the location of each water outlet using 1 of the following categories: (i) The location where a water outlet will be maintained to deliver water for human consumption, whether as drinking water or as a component of a food or beverage, using 1 of the following categories: (A) The location where a filtered bottle-filling station will be maintained. The Except as otherwise provided under subsection (7), the plan must provide for the maintenance of at least 1 filtered bottle-filling station for every 100 occupants of the school, not including visitors or individuals attending special events. (B) The location where a filtered faucet will be maintained. Filtered faucets may be maintained only when the installation of certified lead-free fixtures or a filtered bottle-filling station is not feasible but a water outlet for human consumption is necessary, including, but not limited to, kitchens, nurses' stations, preschool classrooms, and teachers' lounges. (C) The location where a certified lead-free fixture will be maintained. If certified lead-free fixtures are used in conjunction with PEX piping or a central reverse osmosis system, or both, the plan must include information regarding the PEX piping or central reverse osmosis system, or both, including the location where the central reverse osmosis system is installed. (D) The location where any other filtration or fixture system that is certified to meet NSF/ANSI standard 53 for lead reduction and NSF/ANSI standard 42 for particulate removal and provides water with a lead concentration of not more than 5 parts per billion will be maintained. (ii) The location where a water outlet will be maintained for purposes other than as described in subparagraph (i), and whether the water outlet utilizes a certified lead-free fixture. (iii) The location where a water outlet will be shut off or rendered permanently inoperable. (b) Establish Except as otherwise provided under subsection (7), establish a schedule for when each of the following will occur: (i) Annual water sampling and testing of the filtered water at each filtered bottle-filling station and filtered faucet in the school to ensure that the filters are properly installed and provide water with a lead concentration of not more than 5 parts per billion. (ii) Regular replacement of the filter cartridge for each filtered bottle-filling station and filtered faucet in compliance with the manufacturer instructions or recommendations of the department. (2) Each school shall review and update the plan at least once every 5 years and make changes as directed by the department or as needed to comply with this section. (3) A Except as otherwise provided under subsection (7), a school shall comply with the schedules under subsection (1)(b). (4) If the water sampling and testing under subsection (1)(b)(i) indicates the presence of lead at a concentration of 1 part per billion or more but not more than 5 parts per billion, the school shall do all of the following: (a) Immediately check the status of the filter or filters at the filtered bottle-filling station or filtered faucet and replace the filter cartridge if the status light indicates that replacement is or will soon be required. (b) Ensure the filtered bottle-filling station or filtered faucet is properly installed. (c) Resample and retest the filtered water. (d) If water sampling and testing under subdivision (c) indicates the presence of lead at a concentration of 1 part per billion or more but not more than 5 parts per billion, do both of the following: (i) Send a copy of the test results and a document that lists the make and model of the filtered bottle-filling station or filtered faucet and filter cartridge to the department. (ii) Consult with the department and filtered bottle-filling station or filtered faucet manufacturer. (5) If water sampling and testing under subsection (1)(b)(i) or (4)(c) indicates the presence of lead at a concentration of more than 5 parts per billion, the school shall do all of the following: (a) Immediately shut off or otherwise render inoperable the water outlet. (b) Post a conspicuous sign near the water outlet stating that the water outlet is inoperable because of high lead concentration and maintain the sign until the water outlet is returned to service under subdivision (e). (c) Replace the filter cartridge in the filtered bottle-filling station or filtered faucet. (d) Resample and retest the water. (e) If water sampling and testing under subdivision (d) indicates the presence of lead at a concentration of 1 part per billion or more but not more than 5 parts per billion, return the water outlet to service and comply with the requirement under subsection (4)(b), (c), and (d). (f) If water sampling and testing under subdivision (d) indicates the presence of lead at concentration of more than 5 parts per billion, do both of the following: (i) Within Not later than 30 days after receiving the test results, send a copy of the test results to the department and send a notice to school staff and each parent or guardian of a student enrolled in the school, in a manner determined by the school district. The notice must state the amount of lead found in the water and information provided by the department on the health effects of lead exposure and ways to reduce childhood lead exposure. (ii) Develop a remediation plan in consultation with the department and incorporate the remediation plan into the plan under subsection (1). (6) The Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7), the school shall collect the water for the water sampling and testing conducted under this section. The water must be drawn from all of the bubbler fixtures of the filtered bottle-filling stations and filtered faucets and must be collected in 250-milliliter bottles after at least an 8-hour stagnation period and before any water use occurs at the school. Water testing described under this section must be conducted at a laboratory certified for lead and copper testing for the approved EPA method. As used in this subsection, "EPA" means the United States Environmental Protection Agency. (7) If a school identifies in its plan that the school is utilizing fixtures described under subsection (1)(a)(i)(C) or (D), or both, the school is not required to comply with the water sampling and testing requirements described under subsections (4) to (6) and is not required to install filtered bottle-filling stations and filtered faucets. Sec. 7. (1) By Except for a school described under section 5(7), not later than the end of the 2025-2026 school year, each school shall do all of the following: (a) Install all filtered bottle-filling stations and filtered faucets as indicated in the plan and not already in existence. (b) Shut off or render permanently inoperable any water outlet providing water for human consumption that is not a filtered bottle-filling station or filtered faucet. (c) Post a conspicuous sign near each water outlet indicating whether or not the outlet is intended to provide water for human consumption. (2) At the end of the 2025-2026 school year and annually thereafter, each school shall submit to the department documentation, on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department, that certifies that the school has complied with the requirements of this act. (3) Beginning 15 months after the effective date of this act, a A school shall not install a drinking fountain, unless the drinking fountain is a filtered bottle-filling station, on or after January 14, 2025. (4) The legislature shall annually appropriate to the department an amount sufficient to administer and comply with this act. Schools are not required to comply with or otherwise incur costs under this act unless the legislature has appropriated sufficient funds under this subsection.